Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Underwriter and Bond Counsel Services

45A.840.
Definitions for KRS 45A.840 to 45A.879.

As used in KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Bond counsel” means an attorney who provides legal counsel to a bond issuing agency with regard to bond issuance and provides an unqualified legal opinion to the agency with respect to validity and tax treatment;

“Bond issuance” means the formulation, authorization, and issuance of bonds by a bond issuing agency;

“Bond issuing agency” means the State Property and Buildings Commission, Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission, Turnpike Authority of Kentucky, Kentucky Housing Corporation, Kentucky Infrastructure Authority, Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, Kentucky River Authority, Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation, Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority, School Facilities Construction Commission, Murray State University, Western Kentucky University, University of Louisville when it declines to exercise the authority granted under KRS 164A.585(1) and

164A.605

, Northern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, University of Kentucky when it declines to exercise the authority granted under KRS 164A.585(1) and

164A.605

, Morehead State University, Eastern Kentucky University, and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;

“Bonds” means the revenue bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued by a bond issuing agency;

“Executive director” means the executive director of the Office of Financial Management;

“Office” means the Office of Financial Management established by KRS

42.0201

;

“Underwriter” means:

The financial institution which structures and underwrites the bond issuing agency’s issuance of bonds; or

The financial advisor or fiscal agent which provides advice or services to the bond issuing agency with respect to the structure, timing, terms, or other matters concerning bond issuance;

“Underwriter’s counsel” means an attorney who provides legal counsel to an underwriter with respect to its work on behalf of a bond issuing agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 34, effective May 30, 1997; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 12, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 46, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 29, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 85, § 75, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). This section was amended by 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 29 and 85, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

45A.843.
Selection committees.

One (1) or more selection committees shall be created in the Office of Financial Management. Each selection committee shall have the authority to participate in the selection of both underwriters and bond counsel.

Except as provided in KRS

45A.867

and

45A.870

, a selection committee shall participate in every instance of a bond issuing agency hiring an underwriter or bond counsel on behalf of a bond issuing agency.

A selection committee created in the office shall consist of the following six (6) or more members selected in the manner specified within each paragraph:

Three (3) employees of the office other than the executive director. The executive director shall select the three (3) employees;

Two (2) employees of the bond issuing agency appointed by the head of that agency to participate in the hiring of an underwriter or a bond counsel for that agency. However, at the discretion of the head of the bond issuing agency, he may substitute for one (1) of his employees an employee of the agency whose project will be funded by the bond proceeds; and

One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor. The merit employees shall serve as nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then that employee shall attend all committee proceedings. If more than one (1) employee is appointed, then at least one (1) of the employees shall attend any committee proceeding.

All selection committee members shall have experience which qualifies them to serve on the committee.

Any individual appointed to serve by the executive director or the Auditor of Public Accounts shall serve an initial one (1) year term and may be reappointed to serve for additional successive one (1) year terms. He shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case of a vacancy, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.

A selection committee member appointed by the head of a bond issuing agency shall serve for the duration of the selection committee’s participation in the hiring of an underwriter and a bond counsel for his agency. A replacement, in the case of a vacancy, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 46, § 13, effective July 14, 2000.

45A.847.
Orientation of committee members — Committee to be attached to office.

After a person has been appointed to a selection committee, he shall receive an orientation from the office. The orientation shall include, but not be limited to, an explanation of all statutes and administrative regulations pertaining to the person’s service on the selection committee.

For administrative purposes, a selection committee shall be attached to the office.

The office shall provide a selection committee with:

Suitable quarters in Frankfort, Kentucky, in which to conduct its business;

Staff support necessary for the expeditious conduct of a selection committee’s duties and responsibilities; and

Office supplies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.850.
Selection of underwriter and bond counsel for various agencies — Comanaging underwriters — Review by Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.

Pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

, one (1) or more underwriters and one (1) or more bond counsel firms shall be chosen for each of the following agencies:

Turnpike Authority of Kentucky;

Kentucky Housing Corporation;

Kentucky Infrastructure Authority;

Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation;

Kentucky River Authority;

Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation;

Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority;

State Property and Buildings Commission; and

Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority.

The underwriter and the bond counsel chosen for each agency shall provide their services for all bond issuances over a period of twelve (12) months from their selection. At the conclusion of the twelve (12) month period, the executive director may continue the employment of the underwriter or the bond counsel, on the same terms and conditions, for another twelve (12) month period. If the employment is not continued, the choosing of an underwriter or bond counsel, as appropriate, shall be conducted pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

.

Pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

, one (1) or more underwriters and one (1) or more bond counsel firms shall be chosen to provide their services for all of the following agencies:

School Facilities Construction Commission;

Murray State University;

Western Kentucky University;

University of Louisville when it declines to exercise the authority granted under KRS 164A.585(1) and

164A.605

;

Northern Kentucky University;

Kentucky State University;

University of Kentucky when it declines to exercise the authority granted under KRS 164A.585(1) and

164A.605

;

Morehead State University;

Eastern Kentucky University; and

Kentucky Community and Technical College System.

The underwriter and the bond counsel chosen for all of the agencies shall provide their services for all bond issuances of the agencies for a period of twelve (12) months from the underwriter’s and the bond counsel’s selection. At the conclusion of the twelve (12) month period, the executive director may continue the employment of the underwriter or the bond counsel, on the same terms and conditions, for another twelve (12) month period. If the employment is not continued, the choosing of an underwriter or bond counsel, as appropriate, shall be conducted pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

.

Pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

, one (1) or more financial advisors, managing underwriters, and remarketing agents and one (1) bond counsel shall be chosen for the Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission. The commission shall enter into agreements with the individuals or entities for a maximum contract period of twenty-four (24) months. At the conclusion of the contract period, the executive director may continue the employment of the financial advisor, underwriter, remarketing agent, or bond counsel for another contract period, not to exceed twenty-four (24) months. If the employment is not continued or terminated, the selection of a financial advisor, underwriter, remarketing agent, or bond counsel, as appropriate, shall be conducted pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

.

The office may select national comanaging underwriters and Kentucky comanaging underwriters who shall provide national and local marketing expertise for bond issuances. The executive director shall recommend to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet the number of national and Kentucky comanaging underwriters, if any, to be utilized on each bond issuance. The executive director shall consider the following issues when making the recommendations:

Principal amount of bonds being issued;

Structure of the bond issue; and

Composition of expected buyers of the bonds.

Kentucky comanaging underwriters shall be selected pursuant to a request for proposals. National comanaging underwriters shall be selected pursuant to an administrative regulation promulgated by the office. For specific bond transactions under subsection (1) of this section, the executive director may recommend to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as a managing underwriter the Kentucky underwriter which received the highest score for its proposal pursuant to this section. Comanaging underwriters selected pursuant to this subsection shall provide their services to a bond issuing agency as needed over the appropriate period of time stated in this section.

If the executive director recommends to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet a Kentucky underwriter as provided by subsection (4) of this section, and the secretary orders that procurement proceed pursuant to KRS

45A.857

, the requirements, review, and recommendation of the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee as provided by KRS

45.810

shall apply.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35, effective May 30, 1997; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 13, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 92, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2012, ch. 110, § 17, effective April 11, 2012; 2015 ch. 81, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

45A.853.
Prequalification of underwriters and bond counsels — Request for proposals — Response — First meeting of selection committee — Second meeting.

A firm shall not be considered for providing underwriting or bond counsel services unless the office has prequalified the firm prior to the date of issuance of the request for proposals.

A firm’s prequalification shall remain in effect for twenty-four (24) months from the date of prequalification.

The office shall consult with the bond issuing agency before arriving at a request for proposals. The request for proposals shall include, but not be limited to:

The deadline for posing written questions about the request for proposals to the selection committee chairman elected pursuant to subsection (7)(b) of this section. This deadline shall occur before the deadline for filing a written response to a request for proposals;

The deadline for filing a written response;

A description of the services sought;

A description of the skills required to perform the services;

A description of evaluation factors and their relative weight, including the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

; and

In the case of a request for proposals from bond counsel firms, a requirement to submit proposed fees and expenses.

The office shall provide materials to the firms which have prequalified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The materials shall include, but not be limited to, the request for proposals and the evaluation sheet to be used by the relevant selection committee.

Prior to the deadline for posing questions established in the request for proposals, a firm may pose written questions about the request for proposals to the selection committee chairman. The chairman shall respond in writing. If, in the discretion of the chairman, an answer could have a material effect on other respondents’ proposals, then both the question and the answer shall be distributed to all firms at the same time prior to the deadline for the filing of responses to the request for proposals.

A firm shall file a written response to the request for proposals prior to the deadline for filing a written response established in the request for proposals. A firm which fails to meet the deadline shall be barred from the procurement process.

The employees of the office and the members of the selection committee shall keep all responses to a request for proposals confidential until the contract to the winning firm has been awarded.

The executive director of the office shall designate an office employee to identify which firms prequalified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and filed, in a timely fashion, a written response to a request for proposals. He shall create a list of firms which have done so and certify the list.

The office shall organize the selection committee’s first meeting. At that meeting, each selection committee member shall sign a statement of confidentiality. Also, at that meeting, the selection committee shall:

Determine whether a majority of the voting members are merit employees of the Commonwealth. If a majority are not merit employees, the selection committee shall disband, and another selection committee shall be selected pursuant to KRS

45A.843

. A majority of its voting members shall be merit employees of the Commonwealth;

Elect from among the voting members of the committee a chairman and vice chairman who shall hold their positions for the duration of the selection committee’s involvement in the bond issuance;

Be provided with:

The certified list created pursuant to subsection (6) of this section;

If applicable, an out-of-state firm’s preference handicap created pursuant to KRS 45A.873(1);

The request for proposals;

Forms for keeping a log of all contacts with firms which have responded to the request for proposals as well as contacts with persons acting on behalf of those firms. Each committee member shall keep a log which shall summarize the subject of any contact and state the date and place of the contact; and

The selection evaluation sheets; and

Discuss the future conduct of its affairs.

At the second meeting of a selection committee, the committee shall:

Be provided with the following:

Written questions and answers produced pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and

The firms’ responses to the request for proposals; and

Discuss the future conduct of its affairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 139, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 92, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 162, § 18, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.857.
Executive sessions of selection committee — Ranking — Interviews — Awarding of contract.

A selection committee shall meet in executive session to:

Evaluate the materials with which it has been provided;

Select the two (2) to five (5) most qualified firms based upon the weighted evaluation factors in the request for proposals; and

Rank the firms.

In executive session, a selection committee, at its discretion by majority vote, shall determine whether not to interview and to leave the rankings in place, or to interview the two (2) to five (5) firms to arrive at new rankings. If the selection committee decides not to interview and to leave the rankings in place, the winning firm shall be chosen pursuant to paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section, as appropriate.

If the selection committee decides to interview the two (2) to five (5) firms, it shall do so preferably on the same day. The firms shall be interviewed one (1) at a time, and each interview shall be attended only by representatives of the firm and members of the selection committee. Members of the selection committee shall keep confidential the substance of an interview until the contract to the winning firm is awarded.

After the two (2) to five (5) firms have been interviewed, the selection committee shall meet in executive session to:

Rank the firms interviewed based upon the weighted evaluation factors established in the request for proposals; and

Forward the rankings to the executive director.

The winning firm shall be awarded pursuant to paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section, as appropriate.

For underwriter services:

The name of the top-ranked underwriter firm shall be provided to the executive director. He shall state in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet his reasons for agreeing or not agreeing with the selection. The secretary shall order that procurement proceed under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, or he shall order that the procurement procedure start again from the beginning pursuant to KRS

45A.843

. The secretary shall state in writing the reasons for his actions.

The executive director of the office shall negotiate a contract with the top-ranked underwriter firm, as determined by the selection committee, at compensation which the executive director determines in writing to be fair and reasonable to the Commonwealth. In making this decision, he shall take into account the estimated value of the services to be rendered, and the scope, complexity, and professional nature thereof. Should the executive director be able to negotiate a satisfactory price, the top-ranked firm shall be awarded the contract. The executive director shall state in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet his justifications for the negotiated price.

Should the executive director be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the top-ranking firm at a price that he considers fair and reasonable to the Commonwealth, he shall formally terminate negotiations with the firm. The selection committee shall provide the executive director the name of the second-ranked firm. The executive director shall then undertake price negotiations with the second-ranked firm. Should the executive director be able to negotiate a satisfactory price, the second-ranked firm shall be awarded the contract. The executive director shall state in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet his justifications for the negotiated price.

Failing accord with the second-ranked firm, the executive director shall formally terminate negotiations. The selection committee shall provide the executive director the name of the third-ranked firm, if any. The executive director shall then undertake price negotiations with the third-ranked firm. Should the executive director be able to negotiate a satisfactory price, the third-ranked firm shall be awarded the contract. The executive director shall state in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet his reasons for agreeing or not agreeing with the price. Should the executive director be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the third-ranked firm, he shall formally terminate negotiations, and the procurement procedure shall start again from the beginning pursuant to KRS

45A.843

.

For bond counsel services:

The name of the top-ranked firm shall be provided to the executive director. If the executive director does not agree with the selection recommended by the selection committee, the name of the second-ranked firm shall be submitted to the executive director.

The executive director shall submit the name of the first-ranked firm, or the second-ranked firm if the executive director did not agree with the first selection made by the selection committee, to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The executive director shall state in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet his reasons for agreeing or not agreeing with the selection. The secretary shall order the hiring of the selected firm, or he shall order that the procurement procedure shall start again from the beginning pursuant to KRS 45A.843. The secretary shall state in writing the reasons for his actions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 139, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 92, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.860.
Certification of circumstances that may or may not constitute violation of statutes — Retention and inspection of logs and evaluation sheets.

After a winning underwriter or bond counsel contract has been awarded by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS

45A.853

and

45A.857

, the executive director shall supply the name of the firm to each member of the selection committee. The executive director shall also send a letter to each firm which responded to the request for proposals, informing the firm of the name of the underwriter or bond counsel which has been awarded the contract.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, executive director, head of the relevant bond issuing agency, and each voting member of the selection committee shall sign separate certificates, devised by the office, which shall certify that, to the best of his knowledge, he is either aware or unaware of circumstances which may constitute a willful violation of KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

which has arisen in the procurement process.

Any employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts, who was appointed to serve as a nonvoting member of the selection committee and who attended any committee proceeding, shall participate in the preparation of a report for filing with the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee certifying that the applicable procedural provisions of KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

were, or were not, met. Before filing the report, the employee or employees who participated in its preparation shall sign it.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall retain the logs created pursuant to KRS 45A.853(7)(c)4. and the completed selection evaluation sheets required by KRS 45A.853(7)(c)5. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall permit the public to inspect these documents. Each evaluation sheet and each log shall be signed by the person who completed it. The cabinet shall permit the public to inspect these documents and shall not black out the signature of the person who signed the evaluation sheet or the log.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 139, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 92, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.863.
Antinepotism provisions.

A person shall not serve on an underwriter or bond counsel selection committee if that person, his spouse, either of his parents, any of his siblings, or any of his children is employed by a bond counsel or underwriter which has prequalified pursuant to KRS 45A.853(1) or owns one percent (1%) or more of a bond counsel or underwriter firm which has prequalified pursuant to KRS 45A.853(1).

If, in the course of an individual’s service on a selection committee, he, his spouse, either of his parents, any of his siblings, or any of his children is employed by an underwriter or bond counsel which has prequalified pursuant to KRS 45A.853(1) or owns one percent (1%) or more of an underwriter or bond counsel firm which has prequalified pursuant to KRS 45A.853(1), then his membership on the selection committee shall end and the vacancy shall be filled as prescribed in KRS

45A.843

.

For a period of one (1) year after a person ends his service on a selection committee, the Commonwealth shall not consider employing an underwriter or a bond counsel if that person, his spouse, either of his parents, any of his siblings, or any of his children is employed by a firm which was awarded a contract by a selection committee on which he served or owns one percent (1%) or more of a firm which was awarded a contract by a selection committee on which he served.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.867.
Emergency procedure.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

, this section shall govern the selection of an underwriter or a bond counsel in the case of a bona fide emergency.

A bona fide emergency shall be deemed to exist only where the executive director has certified to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that an emergency, threatening substantial interests of the Commonwealth, has arisen from:

A change in the federal tax law; or

A situation other than a change in the federal tax law, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet has stated in writing that he has independently concluded that the situation constitutes an emergency which threatens substantial interests of the Commonwealth.

The cabinet secretary shall forward to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee the certificate created pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section or the certificate and the secretary’s independent conclusion written pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.

The secretary shall also confer with the executive director to determine what measures should be taken to select an underwriter or a bond counsel.

Within thirty (30) days of the selection of an underwriter or a bond counsel pursuant to this section, the executive director, or his designee, shall appear before the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee to report on the emergency selection. The report shall include:

The materials referred to in subsection 3(a) of this section;

His own description of the bona fide emergency;

The procedure used for selecting the underwriter or bond counsel;

The nature of the services that the underwriter or bond counsel will provide;

The length of time for which the firm will provide these services; and

The costs connected with employing the underwriter or bond counsel.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.870.
Procedure to take advantage of an innovation developed by a firm.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

, this section shall govern the selection of an underwriter or a bond counsel to take advantage of an innovation developed by that firm.

The executive director may discuss with an underwriter or a bond counsel an innovation which the firm has developed or is developing.

If the executive director concludes that the Commonwealth will benefit from using the innovation, then the executive director shall negotiate with the firm for it to provide the innovation to the Commonwealth in exchange for the firm’s employment on certain bond issues.

After an agreement is reached, but before it is executed, the executive director shall seek the review and recommendation of the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.

If the committee does not recommend the agreement, the agreement shall be referred to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet who shall:

Revise the agreement in consideration of the committee’s objections;

Cancel the agreement; or

Determine to enter into the agreement.

Within thirty (30) days after the secretary reaches his decision, it shall be transmitted to the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 10, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.873.
Preference for Kentucky firms. [Repealed.]

45A.877.
Reimbursement of underwriters for counsel retained by them for bond issuance — Prohibition against state employee’s recommending selection.

The office shall establish and maintain a schedule of rates at which underwriters will be reimbursed for fees and expenses of counsel they retain for a bond issuance.

Employees of the Commonwealth shall be prohibited from directly or indirectly recommending the selection of the underwriter’s counsel. This section shall not be deemed to prohibit the creation of a list of qualified firms to assist underwriters in the selection of their counsel or from otherwise making general information regarding law firms available to underwriters.

For each bond issuance, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the executive director shall certify to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee that neither they, or, to the best of their knowledge, anyone involved in the selection process, attempted to recommend the hiring of any law firm by an underwriter.

If the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee determines that an employee of the Commonwealth has, at the request of a law firm, recommended the selection of an underwriter’s counsel relating to a bond issuance in an attempt to exercise influence on the selection process, the committee shall recommend to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the firm be prohibited from serving as bond counsel or underwriter’s counsel for a bond issuance for a period of two (2) years, commencing on the date of the determination. The secretary shall follow the recommendation or submit the reasons for not following the recommendation in writing to the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 12, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.879.
Administrative regulations to be promulgated by January 1, 1995.

By January 1, 1995, the office shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 409, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.